Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-728
Nonparentage as defense.

A party whose parentage of a child has been previously determined by or pursuant to law may not plead nonparentage as a defense to a proceeding under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 28.